Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-809
Obscene motion picture, show, or presentation; admit minor; unlawful; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to exhibit to a minor or knowingly to provide to a minor an admission ticket or pass or knowingly to admit a minor to premises whereon there is exhibited a motion picture, show, or other presentation which, in whole or in part, predominantly pruriently, shamefully, or morbidly depicts nudity, sexual conduct, or sadomasochistic abuse and which, taken as a whole, is harmful to minors.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 165;

Laws 1988, LB 117, § 3.